Arkansas, session 2025, HB1326.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 24-7-101 is amended to read as follows:
24-7-101. Special allowances to encourage early retirement.
(a) In order to effect a net savings in personnel costs paid by
colleges and universities, the The presidents and chancellors of the various
publicly supported colleges and universities may, upon the approval of their
respective boards of trustees, negotiate with tenured faculty and staff
members of their institutions so that, in order to secure the faculty
members' early retirement, special allowances may be paid to them the faculty
and staff members or into retirement plans for their benefit.
(b) The board of trustees of each institution is authorized to pay
*LJH069*
02-26-2025 10:33:08 LJH069

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1326
such allowances as the board may approve from any appropriation provided for
regular salaries for the benefit of its institution and from any source of
funds available to its institution.
(c) The amount of all such allowances for any institution shall not
exceed, in the aggregate during any fiscal year, an amount equal to five
percent (5%) of the aggregate paid for personnel costs during the preceding
fiscal year for the institution.
(d) The board of trustees of each institution shall report the exact
disposition of the special allowances to the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee each year.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 24-7-102 is amended to read as follows:
24-7-102. Management of early retirement window incentives.
(a) The purpose of this section is to create incentives for the
efficient management of the public higher education resources of the State of
Arkansas by allowing public higher education institutions to establish early
retirement window incentives for qualified nontenured faculty and staff who
elect voluntary separation from the institution.
(b) The boards of trustees of the publicly supported institutions of
higher education may provide special allowances for nontenured faculty and
staff to effect a saving in personnel salaries and fringe benefits costs when
it is determined by the boards that such saving will provide for more
efficient operation of the institutions.
(c)(1) The boards of trustees shall approve criteria to determine
qualifications to be met by the institutions and the employee.
(2) Such qualifications shall include, but are not limited to:
(A) Assurance that participation is strictly voluntary for
employees;
(B) Only full-time employees who are at least fifty-five
(55) years of age or meet the retirement requirements for the Civil Service
Retirement System any state-sponsored retirement program; and
(C) A savings in personnel cost will be realized by the
institution.
(d) The amount of all such allowances for any institution shall not
exceed, in the aggregate during any fiscal year, an amount equal to five
percent (5%) of the aggregate paid for personnel costs during the preceding
02-26-2025 10:33:08 LJH069

As Engrossed: H2/26/25 HB1326
fiscal year for the institution.
(e) The boards of trustees are authorized to pay such allowances from
any appropriation provided for regular salaries for the benefit of their
institutions and from any sources of funds available to the institutions.
(f)(e) The board of trustees of each institution shall report the
exact disposition of the special allowance to the Legislative Joint Auditing
Committee by July 1 of each year.

SECTION 3. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the contracts between institutions of
higher education and their tenured faculty and staff are in need of urgent
negotiation regarding retirement plans and early retirement window
incentives under §§ 24-7-101 and 24-7-102; and that this act is immediately
necessary because the spring 2025 semester will come to a close before the
act would otherwise become effective, and it is imperative that certain
contracts be negotiated before the end of the spring 2025 semester.
Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and this act being immediately
necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall
become effective on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.

/s/Warren









02-26-2025 10:33:08 LJH069